Utah statutes.
53A-11-904 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Grounds for suspension or expulsion from
a public school.
(1)  A student may be suspended or expelled from a public school for any of
the following reasons:
(a)  frequent or flagrant willful disobedience, defiance of proper authority,
or disruptive behavior, including the use of foul, profane, vulgar, or abusive
language;
(b)  willful destruction or defacing of school property;
(c)  behavior or threatened behavior which poses an immediate and significant
threat to the welfare, safety, or morals of other students or school personnel
or to the operation of the school;
(d)  possession, control, or use of an alcoholic beverage as defined in
Section 32A-1-105;
(e)  behavior proscribed under Subsection (2) which threatens harm or does
harm to the school or school property, to a person associated with the school,
or property associated with that person, regardless of where it occurs; or
(f)  possession or use of pornographic material on school property.
(2) (a)  A student shall be suspended or expelled from a public school for any
of the following reasons:
(i)  any serious violation affecting another student or a staff member, or any
serious violation occurring in a school building, in or on school property, or
in conjunction with any school activity, including:
(A)  the possession, control, or actual or threatened use of a real weapon,
explosive, or noxious or flammable material;
(B)  the actual or threatened use of a look alike weapon with intent to
intimidate another person or to disrupt normal school activities; or
(C)  the sale, control, or distribution of a drug or controlled substance as
defined in Section 58-37-2, an imitation controlled substance defined in
Section 58-37b-2, or drug paraphernalia as defined in Section 58-37a-3; or
(ii)  the commission of an act involving the use of force or the threatened
use of force which if committed by an adult would be a felony or class A
misdemeanor.
(b)  A student who commits a violation of Subsection (2)(a) involving a real
or look alike weapon, explosive, or flammable material shall be expelled from
school for a period of not less than one year subject to the following:
(i)  within 45 days after the expulsion the student shall appear before the
student's local school board superintendent, the superintendent's designee,
chief administrative officer of a charter school, or the chief administrative
officer's designee, accompanied by a parent or legal guardian; and
(ii)  the superintendent, chief administrator, or designee shall determine:
(A)  what conditions must be met by the student and the student's parent for
the student to return to school;
(B)  if the student should be placed on probation in a regular or alternative
school setting consistent with Section 53A-11-907, and what conditions must be
met by the student in order to ensure the safety of students and faculty at
the school the student is placed in; and
(C)  if it would be in the best interest of both the school district or
charter school, and the student, to modify the expulsion term to less than a
year, conditioned on approval by the local school board or governing board of
a charter school and giving highest priority to providing a safe school
environment for all students.
(3)  A student may be denied admission to a public school on the basis of
having been expelled from that or any other school during the preceding 12
months.
(4)  A suspension or expulsion under this section is not subject to the age
limitations under Subsection 53A-11-102(1).
(5)  Each local school board and governing board of a charter school shall
prepare an annual report for the State Board of Education on:
(a)  each violation committed under this section; and
(b)  each action taken by the school district against a student who committed
the violation.
